Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 15 Limited Liability Companies

Cross references. —

As to limited partnerships, see chapter 14 of this title.

As to business corporations generally, see chapter 16 of this title.

As to close limited liability companies in general, see chapter 25 of this title.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Limited Liability Companies: Limited Liability and Taxation Concerns in Other Jurisdictions,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 538 (1992).

For article, “Liabilities of Members and Managers of Wyoming Limited Liability Companies,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 133 (1996).

For article, “Partnership Taxation & The Limited Liability Company: Check Out the Check-the-Box Entity Classification,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 831 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Associations and Clubs § 1 et seq.

7 C.J.S. Associations § 1 et seq.

§ 17-15-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-294, related to limited liability companies.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of the Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act to the Wyoming Close Limited Liability Company Supplement, see §

17-25-102

.

As to conversion of a limited liability company to a close limited liability company, see §

17-25-103

.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Corporations—Managers and Members of Limited Liability Companies Will Be Held to Corporate Agency and Personal Liability Principles.Water, Waste, & Land, Inc. v. Lanham, 955 P.2d 997, 1998 Colo. LEXIS 238 (Colo.1998),” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 463 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of limited liability company acts, 79 ALR5th 689.

§ 17-15-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, 17-295; 1993, ch. 196, § 1; 1995, ch. 79, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 55, § 1, ch. 169 § 1, related to definitions.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-296; 1993, ch. 196, § 1; 1997, ch. 124, § 1, related to purpose.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-297; Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to powers.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-298; Laws 1983, ch. 73, § 1; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 1, 5; 1996, ch. 80, § 2; 1997, ch. 156, § 1; 2009, ch. 55, § 1, related to name.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-229; Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to formation.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-300; Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1; 1995, ch. 79, § 2, related to articles of organization.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-301; Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to filing of articles of organization.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-302, related to effect of issuance of certificate of organization.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-303; 2008, ch. 90, § 2, related to registered office and registered agent to be maintained.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1, related to changes of registered office or registered agent.

§ 17-15-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-305;
Laws 1999, ch. 67, § 1;
ch. 196, § 1;
2008, ch. 90, § 2;
ch. 91, § 2;
2009, ch. 55, § 1; 2010, ch. 60, § 1, related to administrative forfeiture of authority and certificate of organization.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-306, related to liability of members and managers.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1, related to service of process.

§ 17-15-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-308;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to Contributions to capital.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-309;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to management.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-310, related to contracting debts.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-118.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-311, related to property.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-119.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-312;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to division of profits, and impairment of capital.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

To determine the rights and obligations of the members of LLC

with regards to a member who dissociated from LLC, court examined the agreements entered into by members as the members were free to contract any provision they desired, so long as the provision did not conflict with the limited requirements of the Wyoming Limited Liability Company Acts; agreements include (1) articles of organization, (2) operating agreement, and (3) any other contract that sets forth the mutual obligationsLieberman v. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

Where withdrawing member did not voluntarily forfeit his equity interest in a limited liability company (LLC),

and where member failed to contractually provide for mandatory liquidation or a buyout, the member and the LLC were left in status quo—the other members or LLC were not required to buy out the member; it was the duty of a court to construe contracts made between parties, not to make a contract for them. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

Given the absence of any contractual provision to the contrary, where withdrawing member of LLC did not voluntarily forfeit his equity interest there was no reason to treat the withdrawing member any differently from someone who bought into the LLC without becoming a member. Thus, the member was not a member of the LLC, but he maintained his equity interest and all rights and obligations attendant thereto. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

Highest court did not require withdrawn LLC member's equity interest to be bought by LLC or members, as they did not contract for buyout and statute did not require it, and remanded for trial court to define his retained LLC equity rights. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

The member could only be divested of the member's ownership interest if the members of the LLC contracted for such divestment. Lieberman v. Wyoming.com LLC, 2004 WY 1, 82 P.3d 274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 17-15-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-313;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to withdrawal or reduction of members' contributions to capital.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-314;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to liability of member to company.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-122.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-315, related to interest in company, and transferability of interest.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-316, related to dissolution.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-124.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-317;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to filing of statement of intent to dissolve.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-318, related to effect of filing of dissolving statement.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-126.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-319, related to distribution of assets upon dissolution.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-127.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-320;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to articles of dissolution.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-321;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to filing of articles of dissolution.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-129.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-322;
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to cancellation of certificate of organization, and amendment of articles of organization.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-130.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-323, related to parties to actions.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-131.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-324, related to waiver of notice.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-132.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-325; Laws 1981, ch. 47, § 1;
1989, ch. 249, § 2;
1993, ch. 146, § 2;
ch. 196, § 1, 5;
1999, ch. 67, § 1;
2000, ch. 35, § 1, related to fees, and annual tax.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-133.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-326, related to unauthorized assumption of powers.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-134.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-327; Laws 1981, ch. 47, § 1;
1993, ch. 196, § 1, related to charge for service of process.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-135.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-328, related to applicability of provisions to foreign and interstate commerce.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-136.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 158, § 1, related to conflicting laws and existing rights and liabilities.

§ 17-15-137.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to secretary of state powers.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-138.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to correcting filed document.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-139.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to merger.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-140.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to approval of merger by domestic limited liability company.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-141.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to articles of merger.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-142.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2, related to effect of merger.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-143.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 2;
1997, ch. 124, § 1;
2000, ch. 35, § 2;
ch. 48, § 2;
2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1, related to continuance.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-144.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 1995, ch. 79, § 1;
1997, ch. 156, § 1, related to flexible limited liability company.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of flexible limited liability company provisions to a close limited liability company, see §

17-25-109

.

§ 17-15-145.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 42, § 1, related to rights of creditor.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-146.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 1, related to conversion of limited liability company to corporation.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-15-147.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 1, related to effect of conversion.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.